Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.070

Fines and penalties under contracts.

(1) If an action for compliance with the terms of a contract is stayed pursuant to this chapter, a penalty shall not accrue for failure to comply with the terms of the contract during the period of the stay.

(2) If a service member or his or her dependent fails to perform an obligation arising under a contract and a penalty is incurred arising from that nonperformance, a court may reduce or waive the fine or penalty if:

(a)(i) The service member was in military service at the time the fine or penalty was incurred; or

(ii) The action is against a dependent of the service member and the service member was in military service at the time the fine or penalty was incurred; and

(b) The ability of the service member or dependent to perform the obligation was materially affected by the military service.

[ 2005 c 254 s 7.]